Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [59E.01] SHORT TITLE. new text end new text begin This chapter shall be known and cited as the "Rental Home Marketplace Guarantees Act." new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [59E.02] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of commerce. new text end new text begin (c) "Person" means an individual or an entity, excluding a state or local governmental entity. new text end new text begin (d) "Platform contract holder" means a platform user who is the beneficiary or holder of a rental home marketplace guarantee. new text end new text begin (e) "Provider" means: new text end new text begin (1) a rental home marketplace; or new text end new text begin (2) a rental home marketplace affiliate or representative who issues or offers as well as administers, either directly or through a third party, a rental home marketplace guarantee. new text end new text begin (f) "Reimbursement insurance policy" means an insurance policy issued to a provider, pursuant to which the insurer agrees, for the benefit of a platform contract holder, to discharge the provider's obligations and liabilities under the terms of the rental home marketplace guarantee in the event of the provider's default or nonperformance under the rental home marketplace guarantee. new text end new text begin (g) "Rental home marketplace" means a person that: new text end new text begin (1) provides an online application, software, website, system, or other medium that: (i) is used to advertise or offer available property to the public, and (ii) connects and enables platform users' property; new text end new text begin (2) provides, directly or indirectly, or maintains an online platform by: new text end new text begin (i) transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance of a transaction between two platform users; or new text end new text begin (ii) owning or operating the electronic infrastructure or technology that connects two or more platform users; and new text end new text begin (3) if the person offers rental home marketplace guarantees, the person offers rental home marketplace guarantees only in a manner that is ancillary to the conduct of the person's primary legitimate business or activity. new text end new text begin (h) "Rental home marketplace guarantee" means a contract or agreement issued in connection with a rental home marketplace, whether or not the contract or agreement includes a separate consideration, to reimburse a user sharing property for damages the renter is responsible for under the rental home marketplace's terms of service, with or without additional provision for incidental payment of indemnity. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [59E.03] REQUIREMENTS FOR DOING BUSINESS. new text end new text begin (a) A provider is prohibited from issuing or offering a rental home marketplace guarantee unless the provider has made the rental home marketplace guarantee terms available on the provider's website and complied with this chapter. new text end new text begin (b) A provider that offers rental home marketplace guarantees must file a registration with the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner and must pay the commissioner a $750 fee annually. new text end new text begin (c) To ensure the faithful performance of a provider's obligations to the provider's platform contract holders, each provider who is obligated to a platform contract holder shall insure all rental home marketplace guarantees under a reimbursement insurance policy issued (1) by an insurer authorized to transact insurance in Minnesota, or (2) pursuant to sections 60A.195 to 60A.2095. new text end new text begin (d) All providers handling rental home marketplace guarantee losses must be trained in property damage and loss assessment and interpretation of the rental home marketplace guarantee terms before handling losses. Providers must maintain records demonstrating completion of the training under this paragraph. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [59E.04] RENTAL HOME MARKETPLACE GUARANTEES ARE NOT INSURANCE. new text end new text begin A rental home marketplace guarantee does not constitute insurance and is not required to comply with other Minnesota insurance laws if the provider complies with this chapter. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [59E.05] REIMBURSEMENT INSURANCE POLICY. new text end new text begin (a) A reimbursement insurance policy insuring rental home marketplace guarantees must clearly state that upon the provider's default or nonperformance under the rental home marketplace guarantee, the insurer that issued the policy must pay on behalf of the provider any amount the provider is obligated to pay according to the rental home marketplace guarantee. new text end new text begin (b) A reimbursement insurance policy is subject to the laws and regulations governing termination and nonrenewal of insurance policies in Minnesota. The termination of a reimbursement insurance policy does not reduce the issuer's responsibility for rental home marketplace guarantees issued by providers before the termination's effective date. new text end new text begin (c) A provider is the agent of the insurer that issued the reimbursement insurance policy. The insurer retains the right to seek indemnification or subrogation from the provider if the insurer pays or is obligated to pay the platform contract holder the amount the provider was obligated to pay under the rental home marketplace guarantee. This chapter does not prevent or limit the insurer's right in this regard. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [59E.06] CONSUMER PROTECTION AND DISCLOSURES. new text end new text begin (a) A rental home marketplace guarantee must include a statement in substantially the following form: "This rental home marketplace guarantee is not an insurance contract." new text end new text begin (b) A rental home marketplace guarantee must contain a statement in substantially the following form: "The provider's obligations are backed by a reimbursement insurance policy. If the provider is unable or fails to perform on the provider's contractual obligation under a rental home marketplace guarantee within 90 days after the date proof of loss is filed, a platform user is entitled to make a claim directly against the insurance company subject to the terms of the policy." new text end new text begin (c) A rental home marketplace guarantee must be written in clear, understandable language and must specify the terms, limitations, exceptions, conditions, or exclusions, including conditions governing transferability or termination. new text end new text begin (d) A provider is prohibited from making, permitting, or causing to be made a false or misleading statement, or deliberately omitting a material statement whose omission is considered misleading, in connection with offering or advertising a rental home marketplace guarantee. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [59E.07] ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin The commissioner must ensure rental home marketplace guarantees comply with this chapter pursuant to the commissioner's powers under chapter 45. The commissioner must ensure reimbursement insurance policies insuring rental home marketplace guarantees comply with applicable law pursuant to the commissioner's powers under chapters 45 and 60A. new text end